Florida, session 2026, SB1650.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âPresent subsection (5) of section 112.3243, 13 Florida Statutes, as created by SB 92 or similar legislation, 14 2026 Regular Session, is redesignated as subsection (6), and a 15 new subsection (5) is added to that section, to read: 16 112.3243âInvestigative procedures in response to prohibited 17 personnel actions against ethics complaints.â 18 (5)âCONFIDENTIALITY.âAll information received by the 19 commission or information produced or derived from fact-finding 20 or other investigations conducted by the commission is 21 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 22 of the State Constitution if the information is received or 23 derived from allegations as set forth in s. 112.3242 relating to 24 an active investigation. This subsection is subject to the Open 25 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 26 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and 27 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 28 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 29 necessity that all information received by the Commission on 30 Ethics or information produced or derived from fact-finding or 31 other investigations conducted by the commission be made 32 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and 33 s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution until the 34 investigation is terminated or ceases to be active. The 35 premature release of such records could frustrate or thwart an 36 investigation and impair the ability of the commission to 37 effectively and efficiently administer ss. 112.324, 112.3242, 38 and 112.3243, Florida Statutes. In addition, the release of such 39 records before completion of an active investigation could 40 jeopardize an ongoing investigation, thereby affecting the 41 ability of the commission to effectively and efficiently 42 administer the investigation. Therefore, the Legislature finds 43 that the harm that may result from the release of all 44 information received by the commission or information produced 45 or derived from fact-finding or other investigations conducted 46 by the commission pursuant to s. 112.3242, Florida Statutes, 47 outweighs the public benefit that may be derived from the 48 disclosure of the information. 49 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 50 SB 92 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 51 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 52 thereof and becomes a law.